Utah statutes.
53A-15-1216.   Report of noncompliance -- Action to ensure compliance.

(1)  The state superintendent shall report to the State Board of Education any report of noncompliance of this part made to a member of the staff of the State Board of Education.

(2)  The State Board of Education shall take appropriate action to ensure compliance with this part.

